Maryland, session 2025, SB0412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0412*

SENATE BILL 412
(n) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Account holder” has the meaning stated in § 18–1901 of the
Education Article.
(iii) “Contributor” means an individual who contributes funds to a
Maryland Senator Edward J. Kasemeyer Prepaid College Trust account under Title 18,
Subtitle 19 of the Education Article.
(iv) “Qualified higher education expenses” has the meaning stated in
§ 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) The subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes the amount
of advance payments of qualified higher education expenses made by an account holder or
a contributor during the taxable year as provided under a prepaid contract in accordance
with the Maryland Senator Edward J. Kasemeyer Prepaid College Trust.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, for each prepaid contract,
the subtraction under paragraph (2) of this subsection may not exceed:
(I) $2,500 for any taxable year BEGINNING BEFORE JANUARY 1,
2026; AND
(II) $4,850 FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2025.
(4) (I) The amount disallowed as a subtraction under this subsection for
any taxable year BEGINNING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, as a result of the limitation
under paragraph (3) of this subsection shall be treated as having been made in the next
succeeding taxable year and, subject to the $2,500 annual limitation for each prepaid
contract, may be carried over to succeeding taxable years until the full amount of the
advance payments has been allowed as a subtraction.
(II) THE AMOUNT DISALLOWED AS A SUBTRACTION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2025, AS A
RESULT OF THE LIMITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
TREATED AS HAVING BEEN MADE IN THE NEXT SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEAR AND,
SUBJECT TO THE $4,850 ANNUAL LIMITATION FOR EACH PREPAID CONTRACT, MAY
BE CARRIED OVER TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS UNTIL THE FULL AMOUNT OF
THE ADVANCE PAYMENTS HAS BEEN ALLOWED AS A SUBTRACTION.
(o) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.

SENATE BILL 412 3
(ii) “Account holder” means an account holder as defined in §
18–19A–01 or § 18–19B–01 of the Education Article.
(iii) “Contributor” means an individual who contributes funds to a
Maryland Senator Edward J. Kasemeyer College Investment Plan or Broker–Dealer
College Investment Plan account under Title 18, Subtitle 19A or Subtitle 19B of the
Education Article.
(iv) “Investment account” means an investment account as defined
in § 18–19A–01 or § 18–19B–01 of the Education Article.
(v) “Qualified designated beneficiary” means a qualified designated
beneficiary as defined in § 18–19A–01 or § 18–19B–01 of the Education Article.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph and
subject to the limitation under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the subtraction under
subsection (a) of this section includes the amount contributed by an account holder or a
contributor during the taxable year to an investment account.
(ii) The subtraction under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may
not be taken if the account holder received a State contribution under § 18–19A–04.1 of the
Education Article during the taxable year.
(3) (i) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, for each account
holder or contributor for all investment accounts maintained in the Maryland Senator
Edward J. Kasemeyer College Investment Plan and the Maryland Broker–Dealer College
Investment Plan for the same qualified designated beneficiary, the subtraction under
paragraph (2) of this subsection may not exceed [$2,500]:
1. for any taxable year BEGINNING BEFORE JANUARY 1,
2026, $2,500 per qualified designated beneficiary; AND
2. FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2025, $4,850 PER QUALIFIED DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY.
(ii) For purposes of the limitation under this paragraph, each spouse
on a joint return shall be treated separately.
(4) (I) Subject to the $2,500 annual limitation for each account holder
or contributor for each qualified designated beneficiary, the amount disallowed as a
subtraction under this subsection for any taxable year BEGINNING BEFORE JANUARY 1,
2026, as a result of the limitation under paragraph (3) of this subsection may be carried
over until used to the next 10 succeeding taxable years as a subtraction.
(II) SUBJECT TO THE $4,850 ANNUAL LIMITATION FOR EACH
ACCOUNT HOLDER OR CONTRIBUTOR FOR EACH QUALIFIED DESIGNATED

SENATE BILL 412
BENEFICIARY, THE AMOUNT DISALLOWED AS A SUBTRACTION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2025, AS A
RESULT OF THE LIMITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE
CARRIED OVER UNTIL USED TO THE NEXT 10 SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS AS A
SUBTRACTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.